pt-BR: Direção de enrolamento do enrolador de bobinas: Para frente e para trás; Apenas para frente; Apenas para trás; Outros
fi: Puolauslaitteen pyörimissuunta: Eteen- ja taaksepäin; Vain eteenpäin; Vain taaksepäin; Muu
el: Κατεύθυνση περιέλιξης του τυλιχτή μπομπίνας: Εμπρός και όπισθεν; Μόνο εμπρός; Μόνο όπισθεν; Άλλο
sl-SI: Smer navijanja orodja za vreteno: Naprej in nazaj; Samo naprej; Samo nazaj; Drugo
it: direzione di avvolgimento dell'avvolgitore della bobina: In avanti e indietro; Solo in avanti; Solo indietro; Altro
th: ทิศทางการพันด้ายของเครื่องพันด้าย: เดินหน้าและถอยหลัง; เดินหน้าเท่านั้น; ถอยหลังเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
en: Bobbin winder winding direction: Forward and reverse; Forward only; Reverse only; Other
sk-SK: Smer navíjania navíjačky cievky: Vpred a vzad; Len vpred; Len vzad; Iné
fr: Sens d’enroulement du bobineur de canette: Avant et arrière; Avant uniquement; Arrière uniquement; Autre
cs: Směr navíjení navíječky cívky: Vpřed a vzad; Pouze vpřed; Pouze vzad; Jiné
pt-PT: Direção de enrolamento do enrolador de bobina: Avanço e recuo; Apenas avanço; Apenas recuo; Outro
de: Wickelrichtung des Spulenwicklers: Vorwärts und rückwärts; Nur vorwärts; Nur rückwärts; Sonstige
nb: Spoleretning for spolevikler: Forover og bakover; Kun forover; Kun bakover; Annet
es: Dirección de bobinado del devanador de bobinas: Hacia adelante y hacia atrás; Solo hacia adelante; Solo hacia atrás; Otro
nl: Spoelopwinder wikkelrichting: Vooruit en achteruit; Alleen vooruit; Alleen achteruit; Overige
zh-CN: 绕线器绕线方向: 正反转; 仅正转; 仅反转; 其他
sv: Riktning för spolningsmaskin: Framåt och bakåt; Endast framåt; Endast bakåt; Annan
pl: Kierunek nawijania nawijarki szpulek: Do przodu i do tyłu; Tylko do przodu; Tylko do tyłu; Inne
hu: Orsózó tekercselési iránya: Előre és hátra; Csak előre; Csak hátra; Egyéb
bg-BG: Посока на навиване на шпулата при навивачката: Напред и назад; Само напред; Само назад; Друго
lt-LT: Ritės vyniojimo kryptis: Pirmyn ir atgal; Tik pirmyn; Tik atgal; Kita
tr: Masura sarıcı sarım yönü: İleri ve geri; Yalnızca ileri; Yalnızca geri; Diğer
ja: ボビンワインダーの巻き取り方向: 正転および逆転; 正転のみ; 逆転のみ; その他
ru: Направление намотки моталки для шпулек: Вперёд и назад; Только вперёд; Только назад; Другое
hr-HR: Smjer namotavanja namotača špulice: Naprijed i natrag; Samo naprijed; Samo natrag; Ostalo
ko: 보빈 와인더 감기 방향: 정방향 및 역방향; 정방향 전용; 역방향 전용; 기타
da: Oprulningsretning for spoleopruller: Frem og tilbage; Kun frem; Kun tilbage; Andet
vi: Hướng cuộn chỉ của máy cuốn suốt chỉ: Tới và lùi; Chỉ tiến; Chỉ lùi; Khác
ro-RO: Direcția de înfășurare a bobinatorului mosor: Înainte și înapoi; Doar înainte; Doar înapoi; Altele
zh-TW: 捲線器捲繞方向: 正轉與反轉; 僅正轉; 僅反轉; 其他